Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.100

Local infrastructure and public facilities—Grants and loans.

(1) The department shall support the development and maintenance of local infrastructure and public facilities and provide local communities with flexible sources of funding. The department shall coordinate grant and loan programs that provide infrastructure and investment in local communities. This shall include coordinating funding for eligible projects with other federal, state, local, private, and nonprofit funding sources.

(2) At a minimum, the department shall provide coordinated procedures for applying for and tracking grants and loans among and between the community economic revitalization board, the public works trust fund, and community development block grants.

[ 1993 c 280 s 13.]